apertium-dan-nor.nno.dix
<pardef n="lut__n">
<e>       <p><l></l>      <r></r></p><par n="å__n"/></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>ane</l>   <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>ene</l>   <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>ar</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>er</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>en</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="skr/å__n">
<!-- wsd todo -->
<e>       <p><l>åene</l>  <r>å<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>ærne</l>  <r>å<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>åer</l>   <r>å<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>ær</l>    <r>å<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>åa</l>    <r>å<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>åi</l>    <r>å<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>å</l>     <r>å<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>åa</l>    <r>å<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>åi</l>    <r>å<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>å</l>     <r>å<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>ået</l>   <r>å<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>å</l>     <r>å<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="fl/å__n">
<e>       <p><l>ærne</l>  <r>å<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>ær</l>    <r>å<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>åa</l>    <r>å<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>åi</l>    <r>å<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>å</l>     <r>å<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>åane</l>  <r>å<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>åar</l>   <r>å<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>åen</l>   <r>å<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>å</l>     <r>å<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="rang/el__n">
<e>       <p><l>lane</l>  <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>lar</l>   <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>elen</l>  <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>el</l>    <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>la</l>    <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>li</l>    <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>el</l>    <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>elet</l>  <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>let</l>   <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>el</l>    <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="drops__n">
<e>       <p><l></l>      <r></r></p><par n="ty__n"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>a</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>en</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="taf/fel__n">
<e>       <p><l>la</l>    <r>fel<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>li</l>    <r>fel<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>fel</l>   <r>fel<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>felet</l> <r>fel<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>let</l>   <r>fel<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>fel</l>   <r>fel<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="gerani/um__n">
<e>       <p><l>ane</l>   <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>ar</l>    <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>en</l>    <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>umen</l>  <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>um</l>    <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="hurk/el__n">
<e>       <p><l>ela</l>   <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>eli</l>   <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>la</l>    <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>li</l>    <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>el</l>    <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>elet</l>  <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>let</l>   <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>el</l>    <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="id/e__n">
<e>       <p><l></l>          <r></r></p><par n="STD_f/e__n"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>eane</l>  <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>ear</l>   <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>een</l>   <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>e</l>     <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="barsel"><i>bars</i><par n="hurk/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="dingeldangel"><i>dingeldang</i><par n="hurk/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="drops"><i>drops</i><par n="drops__n"/></e>
<e lm="flygel"><i>flyg</i><par n="rang/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="geranium"><i>gerani</i><par n="gerani/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="kjørel"><i>kjør</i><par n="hurk/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="krangel"><i>krang</i><par n="rang/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="rangel"><i>rang</i><par n="rang/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="heimel"><i>heim</i><par n="rang/el__n"/></e>
